North Carolina, session 2025, HB1196.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 18B-1006 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(t) Furnishing of Water Without Charge. – The holder of an on-premises malt beverage
permit, on-premises unfortified wine permit, on-premises fortified wine permit, or mixed
beverages permit issued under G.S. 18B-1001 shall furnish potable water without charge to any
customer on the licensed premises requesting the water. A permittee subject to this subsection is
only required to furnish water under this subsection during the hours in which the alcoholic
beverage may be sold under G.S. 18B-1004. The water required to be furnished under this
subsection shall meet all federal and State requirements concerning purity of drinking water and
shall be supplied in a receptacle suitable to permit the individual consumption of not less than 6
fluid ounces per serving. For purposes of this subsection, the term "customer" means a person
who pays a fee or other charge to enter the licensed premises, purchases an alcoholic beverage
or other product from the permittee, or pays a fee or other charge to enter the licensed premises
and purchases an alcoholic beverage or other product from the permittee."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Division of Alcohol
Law Enforcement of the Department of Public Safety the sum of fifteen thousand dollars
($15,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used to produce and place
informational posters making persons aware of the requirement set forth in G.S. 18B-1006(t), as
enacted by Section 1 of this act. The Division shall distribute the posters required under this
section to affected permittees, and the permittees shall prominently display the posters on the
licensed premises in a place that is clearly conspicuous and visible to customers.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this act is effective retroactively to July 1, 2025. The
remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law and applies to requests made on or after
that date.
*H1196-v-1*